Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3544
Professional geologist; licensure; eligibility; application.

(1) The following are required for an applicant to be eligible for licensure by the board as a professional geologist under this section:

(a) The applicant has completed the education requirement of graduating from a geology or geologic specialty program with a minimum of thirty semester hours or forty-five quarter hours of course work in geology that includes course work in the content domains and hours as prescribed by the board;

(b) The applicant has passed the examination on the fundamentals of geology or a similar examination that is approved by the board;

(c) The applicant has passed the examination on the practice of geology or a similar examination that is approved by the board;

(d) The applicant has passed an examination on the statutes, rules, regulations, and other requirements unique to Nebraska;

(e) The applicant has a documented record of four or more years of progressive experience, obtained subsequent to completion of the education requirement, in geologic work of a grade and character which indicates to the board that the applicant may be competent to practice geology;

(f) The applicant has submitted an application accompanied by the fee established by the board; and

(g) The applicant has submitted one or more acceptable written references.

(2)(a) Any individual may apply for licensure as a professional geologist after completing the requirements specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(b) The board may authorize the licensure as a professional geologist for any individual described in subdivision (a) of this subsection once the individual has completed the requirements specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(c) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that specify when an individual may apply for licensure as a professional geologist.

Laws 2025, LB38, § 34.